North Dakota statutes. TITLE 35 Liens
CHAPTER 35-30 Agricultural Processor’s Lien

35-30-01.
Agricultural processor’s lien authorized.

Any person who processes any crop or agricultural product is entitled to a lien upon the crop or product processed for the reasonable value of the services performed. A lien taken pursuant to this section upon anything other than the crop or product processed is void. As used in this chapter, the term “processor” includes persons threshing, combining, drying, or harvesting any crop or agricultural product. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the agricultural processor’s lien is effective from the date the processing is completed. An agricultural processor’s lien filed as a security interest created by contract to secure money advanced or loaned for any purpose is not effective to secure a priority over liens filed under section 35-05-01. This chapter does not limit the sale, assignment, or transfer of an agricultural processor’s lien. However, the priority of an effective agricultural processor’s lien is not transferable. After sale, assignment, or transfer, the priority of an effective agricultural processor’s lien is to be determined as of the date the lien was filed and in accordance with section 41-09-33.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 412, § 3; 1991, ch. 449, § 7; 1997, ch. 306, § 1; 2007, ch. 299, § 1.

35-30-02.
Procedure to obtain lien.

To obtain an agricultural processor’s lien, the person entitled to the lien, within ninety days after the processing is completed, shall file electronically a statement in the central indexing system. The statement must contain the following information:

The name and address of the person for whom the processing was done.

The name and address of the processor.

A description of the crops or agricultural products and their amount, if known, subject to the lien together with a reasonable description, including the county as to the location where the crops or agricultural products were grown and the year the crop is to be harvested or was harvested.

The price agreed upon for processing, or if no price was agreed upon, the reasonable value of the processing.

The social security number or, in the case of a debtor doing business other than as an individual, the internal revenue service taxpayer identification number of the person for whom the processing was done.

A description of the processing services and the first date the services were furnished.

The secretary of state shall provide an electronic means to obtain a lien under this section or gain protection under the central notice system, or both. Before a processor’s lien is filed, a billing statement for the services performed must include notice to the agricultural producer that if the amount due to the agricultural processor is not satisfied a lien may be filed.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 412, § 3; 1991, ch. 449, § 8; 1997, ch. 306, § 2; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2007, ch. 300, § 1; 2011, ch. 250, § 3; 2013, ch. 257, § 12; 2015, ch. 372, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by
section 12 of chapter 257, S.L. 2013 becomes effective August 1, 2016, or earlier (See contingency note below).

Note.

Ch. 372 amends chapter 257 of 2013 to provide a new effective date, August 1, 2016.

Section 50 of chapter 257, S.L. 2013 provides:

“CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE.

Sections 1 through 27 and sections 29 through 47 of this Act become effective August 1, 2015, or earlier if the secretary of state makes a report to the legislative management and to the information technology committee certifying that the information technology components of the electronic filing system are ready for implementation of those provisions of this Act, in which case those sections become effective ninety days following the completion of the certificate requirement.”

A court cannot, under guise of construction, absolve lien claimant from duty of complying with statutory requirements as basis for existence of lien. Carlson v. Powers Elevator Co., 61 N.D. 438, 238 N.W. 548, 1931 N.D. LEXIS 294 (N.D. 1931).

In an action for wrongful conversion of personal property on which plaintiff claims a thresher’s lien, the debt or demand, based on a contract having no connection with the transaction set forth in the complaint, is not available as a counterclaim. Allis-Chalmers Mfg. Co. v. Amenia Seed & Grain Co., 54 N.D. 153, 209 N.W. 234, 1926 N.D. LEXIS 126 (N.D. 1926).

Landlord of one employing thresher is not required to be named in lien. Dahlund v. Lorentzen, 30 N.D. 275, 152 N.W. 684, 1915 N.D. LEXIS 132 (N.D. 1915).

A person who is entitled to a threshing lien must include in statement to be filed debtor’s name, correctly spelled, in order to file and index lien under first letter of surname. Schatz v. Kintyre Farmers' Co-op. Elevator Co., 52 N.D. 290, 202 N.W. 855, 1925 N.D. LEXIS 28 (N.D. 1925).

Only the owner and operator of threshing machine is entitled to thresher’s lien, and statement required to be filed must contain description of the land. Parker v. First Nat'l Bank, 3 N.D. 87, 54 N.W. 313, 1892 N.D. LEXIS 12 (N.D. 1892); Martin v. Hawthorn, 3 N.D. 412, 57 N.W. 87, 1893 N.D. LEXIS 38 (N.D. 1893).

One is estopped from asserting a thresher’s lien against an elevator where, before filing statement, claimant accompanies owner to elevator and remains silent while owner sells grain and receives payment therefor. Branthover v. Monarch Elevator Co., 33 N.D. 454, 156 N.W. 927, 1916 N.D. LEXIS 76 (N.D. 1916).

The lien exists from commencement of threshing, and person who purchases grain within thirty-day period takes it subject to lien, although statement was not filed at time of purchase. Warren v. Olson, 46 N.D. 203, 180 N.W. 529, 1920 N.D. LEXIS 65 (N.D. 1920).

The thresher’s lien statute gives to a thresher an inchoate lien for a thirty-day period after completion of the threshing, although lien statement is not on file. Rogers Lumber Co. v. Schatzel, 52 N.D. 837, 204 N.W. 854, 1925 N.D. LEXIS 155 (N.D. 1925).

If grain threshed is grown in two counties, the statement required to be filed must be executed in duplicate and one copy filed in each county. Gorthy v. Jarvis, 15 N.D. 509, 108 N.W. 39, 1906 N.D. LEXIS 55 (N.D. 1906).

A misstatement of the quantity of grain threshed does not invalidate a thresher’s lien properly filed, if misstatement resulted honestly without fraudulent intent. Murie v. National Elevator Co., 60 N.D. 665, 236 N.W. 269, 1931 N.D. LEXIS 216 (N.D. 1931).

A thresher’s lien is purely of statutory origin, and one who claims such a lien must bring himself under terms of statute authorizing its creation. Moher v. Rasmusson, 12 N.D. 71, 95 N.W. 152, 1903 N.D. LEXIS 11 (N.D. 1903).

When a thresher is engaged to thresh grain, he need not investigate to ascertain what liens or encumbrances there may be outstanding against the grain, for he knows that he is given security upon grain threshed for amount of threshing bill, and this without regard to existing liens or encumbrances. Mace v. Cole, 50 N.D. 866, 198 N.W. 816, 1924 N.D. LEXIS 41 (N.D. 1924).

The failure of a lien claimant whose lien is satisfied while in an inchoate state to file lien statement under this section does not render right of one discharging claim subject to inferior liens. Rogers Lumber Co. v. Schatzel, 52 N.D. 837, 204 N.W. 854, 1925 N.D. LEXIS 155 (N.D. 1925).

To uphold a seizure of grain under a thresher’s lien, party making seizure must show that grain seized was grown upon land described in statement for the lien. Martin v. Hawthorne, 5 N.D. 66, 63 N.W. 895, 1895 N.D. LEXIS 13 (N.D. 1895).

The failure to set forth amount and quantity of grain threshed in statement filed is fatal to the lien. Moher v. Rasmusson, 12 N.D. 71, 95 N.W. 152, 1903 N.D. LEXIS 11 (N.D. 1903); Brodina v. Vranek, 50 N.D. 420, 196 N.W. 311, 1923 N.D. LEXIS 115 (N.D. 1923).

The quantity of each grain threshed need not be stated in thresher’s lien if total amount is stated. Mitchell v. Monarch Elevator Co., 15 N.D. 495, 107 N.W. 1085, 1906 N.D. LEXIS 51 (N.D. 1906).

The statement is not required to specify amount of each kind of grain threshed, when amount of lien claimed appears definitely by computation from facts given in statement. Mitchell v. Monarch Elevator Co., 15 N.D. 495, 107 N.W. 1085, 1906 N.D. LEXIS 51 (N.D. 1906).

A failure to comply with thresher’s lien statute is fatal to the lien. Auth v. Kuroki Elevator Co., 40 N.D. 533, 169 N.W. 80, 1918 N.D. LEXIS 99 (N.D. 1918).

This section does not require a lien statement to show that parties agreed upon a certain price per bushel for threshing, and agreement to pay thresher by hour does not invalidate the lien. Hiam v. Andrews Grain Co., 48 N.D. 250, 183 N.W. 1016, 1921 N.D. LEXIS 32 (N.D. 1921).

“Verified by oath”, as used in thresher’s lien statute, means that oath must be administered by an authorized official to party claiming lien, and such party must indicate that he knows he is taking the oath. Agricultural Bond & Credit Corp. v. Courtenay Farmers' Coop. Ass'n, 64 N.D. 253, 251 N.W. 881, 1933 N.D. LEXIS 272, 1933 N.D. LEXIS 273 (N.D. 1934).

The thresher’s lien of a lessee under a cropper’s contract is not waived by delivery at an elevator according to contract, although it results in commingling. Blank v. Fenton, 54 N.D. 837, 211 N.W. 590, 1926 N.D. LEXIS 91 (N.D. 1926).

Where a farm laborer delivered grain on which he claimed a lien to elevator in performance of his work, he did not waive his right to lien. Wonser v. Walden Farmers' Elevator Co., 31 N.D. 382, 153 N.W. 1012, 1915 N.D. LEXIS 191 (N.D. 1915).

35-30-03.
Priority.

An agricultural processor’s lien obtained under this chapter has priority, as to the crops or agricultural products covered thereby, over all other liens or encumbrances.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 412, § 3.

35-30-04.
Secretary of state to remove and destroy certain documents.

The secretary of state shall remove and destroy liens filed in the secretary of state’s office pursuant to this chapter in the manner provided for in section 11-18-14 for the recorder.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 449, § 9; 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

35-30-05.
Amendment of lien.

A lienholder may file electronically an amendment to correct the social security or internal revenue service taxpayer identification number of the debtor, to correct the spelling of the debtor’s or lienholder’s name, or to correct or change the address of the debtor or lienholder. The secretary of state shall provide an electronic means to amend or assign the agricultural processor’s lien that has been filed pursuant to section 35-30-02. The amendment or assignment of a lien does not affect the priority of the lien.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 346, § 2; 2013, ch. 257, § 13; 2015, ch. 372, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 13 of chapter 257, S.L. 2013 becomes effective August 1, 2015, or earlier (See contingency note below).

Note.

Ch. 372 amends chapter 257 of 2013 to provide a new effective date, August 1, 2016.

Section 50 of chapter 257, S.L. 2013 provides:

“CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE.

Sections 1 through 27 and sections 29 through 47 of this Act become effective August 1, 2015, or earlier if the secretary of state makes a report to the legislative management and to the information technology committee certifying that the information technology components of the electronic filing system are ready for implementation of those provisions of this Act, in which case those sections become effective ninety days following the completion of the certificate requirement.”

35-30-06.
Fees — Penalty.

The fee for filing electronically an agricultural processor’s lien and related documents in the central indexing system is the same as that provided for in section 41-09-96. If a lienholder fails to file a termination statement within sixty days after the lien has been satisfied, the lienholder is liable to the debtor for one hundred dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 346, § 2; 1997, ch. 303, § 2; 1999, ch. 314, § 3; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2007, ch. 298, § 2; 2013, ch. 257, § 14; 2015, ch. 372, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by
section 14 of chapter 257, S.L. 2013 becomes effective August 1, 2016, or earlier (See contingency note below).

Note.

Ch. 372 amends chapter 257 of 2013 to provide a new effective date, August 1, 2016.

Section 50 of chapter 257, S.L. 2013 provides:

“CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE.

Sections 1 through 27 and sections 29 through 47 of this Act become effective August 1, 2015, or earlier if the secretary of state makes a report to the legislative management and to the information technology committee certifying that the information technology components of the electronic filing system are ready for implementation of those provisions of this Act, in which case those sections become effective ninety days following the completion of the certificate requirement.”